Utah statutes.
78B-16-104.   Actions for abduction prevention measures.

(1)  A court on its own motion may order abduction prevention measures in a child custody proceeding if the court finds that the evidence establishes a credible risk of abduction of the child.

(2)  A party to a child custody determination or another individual or entity having a right under the law of this state or any other state to seek a child custody determination for the child may file a petition seeking abduction prevention measures to protect the child under this chapter.

(3)  A prosecutor or public authority designated under Section 78B-13-315 may seek a warrant to take physical custody of a child under Section 78B-16-109 or other appropriate prevention measures.

